src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v2_taittaat !!≈ **@CODE@** ! taisi, tainu / taitanu
+Inf:taittaat K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:taiđan K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:taiđat K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:taittaa K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:taiđama K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:taiđatta K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:taiđethaan K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:taitavat K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:taisin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:taisit K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:taisi K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:taisima K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:taisitta K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:taiđethiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:taisivat K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:taiđethaan K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:taiđethiin K ;  
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:tainu K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:taitanu K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:tainheet K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:taitanheet K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:tainu K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:taitanu K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:taitu K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:taiđettu K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:taiđa K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg1:taisin K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2:taisit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:taisi K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:taisi K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:taisima K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:taisitta K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:taittais K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:taiđettais K ;
+Pass+Cond:taittais K ;
+Pass+Cond:taiđettais K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ine:taitamassa K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:taitamasta K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:taitamhaan K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:taitamalla K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:taitamatta K ;

LEXICON v2_sauttaat !!≈ **@CODE@** ! sauttaat-sautti
+Inf:sauttaat K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:sautan K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:sautat K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:sauttaa K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:sautamma K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:sautatta K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:sautethaan K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:sautavat K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:sautin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:sautit K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:sautti K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:sautimma K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:sautitta K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:sautethiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:sautivat K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:sautethaan K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:sautethiin K ;  
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:sauttannu K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:sauttanheet K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:sauttannu K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl:sauttanheet K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:sautettu K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:sautetut K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:sautettava K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:sautettavat K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:sauta K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg1:sauttaisin K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2:sauttaisit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:sauttais K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:sauttais K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:sauttaisima K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:sauttaisitta K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:sautettais K ;
+Pass+Cond:sautettais K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ine:sauttamassa K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:sauttamasta K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:sauttamhaan K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:sauttamala K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:sauttamalta K ;

LEXICON v2_särkkyyt !!≈ **@CODE@** ! särkkyyt-särjyn
+Inf:särkkyyt K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:särjyn K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:särjyt K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:särkkyy K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:särjymä K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:särjyttä K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:särjythään K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:särkyvät K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:särjyin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:särjyit K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:särkyi K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:särjyimä K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:särjyittä K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:särjythiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:särkyivät K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:särjythään K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:särjythiin K ;  
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:särkyny K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:särkynheet K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:särkyny K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl:särkynheet K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:särjytty K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:särjytyt K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:särjyttävä K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:särjyttävät K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:särjy K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg1:särkyisin K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2:särkyisit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:särkyis K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:särkyis K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:särkyisimmä K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:särkyisittä K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:särjyttäis K ;
+Pass+Cond:särjyttäis K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ine:särkymässä K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:särkymästä K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:särkymhään K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:särkymällä K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:särkymältä K ;

LEXICON v2_tiettäät !!≈ **@CODE@** tiettäät
+Inf:tä%>^Vt K ;
+Inf+Err/Orth:tä%>^A K ;  !
+Act+Ind+Prs:tä^WG v12pers_short ;
+Act+Ind+Prt:tä^AO%>i3 v12pers_short ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:tä%>^V K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:tä^WG^AE%>th^A^An K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:tä^AO%>i3 K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Dial/Por:tä^WG^AE%>thiin K ; ! TODO! murre vai Err/Orth
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Dial/Jok:si^WG^AE%>vät K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Dial/Var:si^WG^AE%>vät K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:tä^WG^AE%>th^A^An K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:tä^WG^AE%>thiin K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:tä%>^N^U K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:ny K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:tä%>^N^U K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:ny K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:tä^WG^AE%>tt^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:tä^WG^AE%>t^U%>t K ;
!+Act+PrfPrc:tä%>^Nhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:tä%>^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:tä%>^V%>v^A K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:tä%>^V%>v^At K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:tä^WG^AE%>tt^A%>v^A K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:tä^WG^AE%>tt^A%>v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:tä^WG K ;

+Act+Cond+Sg1:tä^VDEL%>i4sin K ; ! antaisin
+Act+Cond+Sg2:tä^VDEL%>i4sit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:tä^VDEL%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:tä^VDEL%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:tä^VDEL%>i4simm^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:tä^VDEL%>i4sitt^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:tä^WG^AE%>tt^A%>i4s K ;
+Pass+Cond:tä^WG^AE%>tt^A%>i4s K ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:tä^WG K   ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:tä%>kk^A^A K ;

+Act+Inf3+Ine:tä%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:tä%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:tä%>mh^A^An K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:tä%>m^All^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:tä%>m^Att^A K ;
+Act+Inf3:tä%>m^A MATON ;
+Der+Der/minen:tämi n_22_inen ;


LEXICON v2_odd !!≈ **@CODE@** kirjoittaat:kirjoitta
+Inf:%>^Vt K ;        ! kveenin inf valmistuut
+Inf+Err/Orth:%>^A K ; ! suomalainen inf valmistua

+Act+Ind+Prs:^WG v12pers_long ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^V K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG^AE%>th^A^An K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>v^At K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG^AE%>th^A^An K ; 

+Act+Ind+Prt:^WG%>i3 v12pers_long ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG^AE%>thiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WG^AE%>thiin K ; 
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:^WG%>siv^At K ; !TEST

!+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>nn^U K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>nn^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG^AE%>tt^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG^AE%>t^U%>t K ; 
!+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^V%>v^A K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^V%>v^At K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG^AE%>tt^A%>v^A K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG^AE%>tt^A%>v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WG K ;

+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; ! kirjoittaisin
+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4sim^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:^WG^AE%>tt^A%>i4s K ;
+Pass+Cond:^WG^AE%>tt^A%>i4s K ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:^WG K   ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kk^A^A K ;

+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>mh^A^An K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>m^Al^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;
+Act+Inf3:%>m^A MATONodd ;
+Der+Der/minen:mi n_22_inen ;
