src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
taittaat+Hom1+V: v2_taittaat ; ! taisi, tainu / taitanu
saavuttaat+V+TV:saavutta v2_odd ;
sauttaat+Hom1+V: v2_sauttaat ;
särkkyyt+Hom1+V: v2_särkkyyt ;
joukahtaat+V:joukahta v2_odd ;
ammelttaat+V+TV:ammelta v2_odd ;
keventtäät+V+TV:keventä v2_odd ;
käänhäättäät+V+TV:käänhäättä v2_odd ;
musthaattaat+V+TV:musthaatta v2_odd ;
pelastaat+V:pelasta v2_odd ;
sairastaat+V:sairasta v2_odd ;
aivastaat+V:aivasta v2_odd ;
tođistaat+V:tođista v2_odd ;
rukattaat+V+TV:rukatta v2_odd ;
vuođattaat+V+TV:vuođatta v2_odd ;
kartoittaat+V+TV:kartoitta v2_odd ;
sovittaat+V+TV:sovitta v2_odd ;
ulostaat+V:ulosta v2_odd ;
oikkeuttaat+V+TV:oikkeutta v2_odd ;
laikuttaat+V+TV:laikutta v2_odd ;
nukahtaat+V:nukahta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
seisahtaat+V:seisahta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
tervettiit+V:tervett2i v2_odd ;
vaatettiit+V:vaatetti v2_odd ;
paskanttaat+V+TV:paskanta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kostanttaat+V+TV:kostanta v2_odd ;
ryötyttäät+V+TV:ryötyttä v2_odd ;
lujenttaat+V+TV:lujenta v2_odd ;
rakenttaat+V+TV:rakenta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
oksenttaat+V+TV:oksenta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
puserttaat+V+TV:puserta v2_odd ;
kajastaat+V:kajasta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
henkastaat+V:henkasta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
mellastaat+V:mellasta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
varastaat+V:varasta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
oikaistaat+V:oikaista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
ulosjulistaat+V:ulos#julista v2_odd ;
valmistaat+V:valmista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kaunistaat+V:kaunista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
karistaat+V:karista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
varistaat+V:varista v2_odd ;
kesyttäät+V+TV:kesyttä v2_odd ;
säikyttäät+V+TV:säikyttä v2_odd ;
vahvistaat+V:vahvista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
puđistaat+V:puđista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kuulostaat+V:kuulosta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
arvostaat+V:arvosta v2_odd ; 
tuohustaat+V:tuohusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
vilustaat+V:vilusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
priimustaat+V:priimusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
perustaat+V:perusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
vastustaat+V:vastusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
savustaat+V:savusta v2_odd ;
jarruttaat+V+TV:jarrutta v2_odd ;
kuristaat+V:kurista v2_odd ;
kuossuttaat+V+TV:kuossutta v2_odd ;
tiphattaat+V+TV:tiphatta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
paukattaat+V+TV:paukatt2a v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rallattaat+V+TV:rallatta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
armattaat+V+TV:armatt2a v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd
hirnattaat+V+TV:hirnatta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
vaihettaat+V+TV:vaihetta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
pujettaat+V+TV:pujetta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
opettaat+V+TV:opetta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
ojittaat+V+TV:ojitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
toimittaat+V+TV:toimitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
sonnittaat+V+TV:sonnitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rauhoittaat+V+TV:rauhoitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rasittaat+V+TV:rasitta v2_odd ;
lymmyttäät+V+TV:lymmyttä v2_odd ;
ylittäät+V+TV:ylittä v2_odd ;
karkoittaat+V+TV:karkoitta v2_odd ;
ilmoittaat+V+TV:ilmoitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
haavoittaat+V+TV:haavoitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kaupittaat+V+TV:kaupitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
fangittaat+V+TV:fangitta v2_odd ;
huvittaat+V+TV:huvitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
jätästäät+V:jätästä v2_odd ;
rauhottaat+V+TV:rauhotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
vajottaat+V+TV:vajotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
toppuuttaat+V+TV:toppuutta v2_odd ;
pakottaat+V+TV:pakotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
laukottaat+V+TV:laukotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
janottaat+V+TV:janotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
painottaat+V+TV:painotta v2_odd ;
varottaat+V+TV:varotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
erottaat+V+TV:erotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
vistottaat+V+TV:vistotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
hieđottaat+V+TV:hieđotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
puđottaat+V+TV:puđotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
nosthauttaat+V+TV:nosthautta v2_odd ;
suijuttaat+V+TV:suijutta v2_odd ;
keikuttaat+V+TV:keikutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rypyttäät+V+TV:rypyttä v2_odd ;
huiskuttaat+V+TV:huiskutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
tiuskuttaat+V+TV:tiuskutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
huomhauttaat+V+TV:huomhautta v2_odd ;
taluttaat+V+TV:talutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kuluttaat+V+TV:kulutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
taputtaat+V+TV:taputta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
viruttaat+V+TV:virutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
tartuttaat+V+TV:tartutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kassuuttaat+V+TV:kassuutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
mahđuttaat+V+TV:mahđutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
häämöttäät+V+TV:häämöttä v2_odd ;
elättäät+V+TV:elättä v2_odd ;
hiljenttäät+V+TV:hiljentä v2_odd ;
säikähtäät+V:säikähtä v2_odd ;
lyhenttäät+V+TV:lyhentä v2_odd ;
ylenttäät+V+TV:ylentä v2_odd ;
pienenttäät+V+TV:pienentä v2_odd ;
rynkistäät+V:rynkistä v2_odd ;
virkistäät+V:virkistä v2_odd ;
käyristäät+V:käyristä v2_odd ;
yhđistäät+V:yhđistä v2_odd ;
tehettäät+V+TV:tehettä v2_odd ;
naurattaat+V+TV:nauratta v2_odd ;
käsittäät+V+TV:käsittä v2_odd ;
kenkittäät+V+TV:kenkittä v2_odd ;
selittäät+V+TV:selittä v2_odd ;
pehmittäät+V+TV:pehmittä v2_odd ;
kiinittäät+V+TV:kiinittä v2_odd ;
jännittäät+V+TV:jännittä v2_odd ;
vierittäät+V+TV:vierittä v2_odd ;
välättäät+V+TV:välätt2ä v2_odd ;
ripittäät+V+TV:ripittä v2_odd ;
selvittäät+V+TV:selvittä v2_odd ;
läiskyttäät+V+TV:läiskyttä v2_odd ;
synnyttäät+V+TV:synnyttä v2_odd ;
pyöryttäät+V+TV:pyöryttä v2_odd ;
sytyttäät+V+TV:sytyttä v2_odd ;
jähđyttäät+V+TV:jähđyttä v2_odd ;
kierättäät+V+TV:kierättä v2_odd ;
päästättäät+V+TV:päästättä v2_odd ;
yllättäät+V+TV:yllättä v2_odd ;
höyryttäät+V+TV:höyryttä v2_odd ;
piđättäät+V+TV:piđättä v2_odd ;
tiettäät+V+TV:tie v2_tiettäät ;
